District of Columbia statutes.
25-703

Manager and owner conduct requirement.

The Board-approved manager of an establishment or owner of the establishment who personally superintends the establishment during licensed hours of sale shall not be under the influence of alcohol or illegal drugs.

May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-270, § 2(e)(2), 62 DCR 1866